Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.070

Receipt of federal funds for school purposes—Superintendent of public instruction to administer.

The state of Washington and/or any school district is hereby authorized to receive federal funds made or hereafter made available by acts of congress for the assistance of school districts in providing physical facilities and/or maintenance and operation of schools, or for any other educational purpose, according to provisions of such acts, and the state superintendent of public instruction shall represent the state in the receipt and administration of such funds.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.100. Prior: 1943 c 220 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 5109-4. Formerly RCW 28A.02.100, 28.02.100.]